Florida, session 2026, HB77.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 1004.0983, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
1004.0983 Public postsecondary safety policies and
procedures.—
(1) Each state university and Florida College System
institution shall adopt and implement written policies and
procedures to protect the physical safety of its students,
faculty, staff, and visitors in campus facilities, classrooms,
and other institutional settings from:
(a) Physical threats.
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb77-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 77 2026
(b) Other conduct or language that would cause a
reasonable person to believe his or her physical safety is at
risk.
(2) The policies and procedures must:
(a) Identify a person responsible for:
1. Coordinating the state university or Florida College
System institution's response to actions listed in paragraphs
(1)(a) and (b).
2. Implementing such policies and procedures, including
all safety measures.
(b) Establish clear internal and external reporting
protocols, including notification of campus security or a local
law enforcement agency when appropriate.
(c) Outline the protective measures available to affected
persons, which may include work or class relocation, security
escorts, and restricting access to certain areas by a person
engaged in an activity listed in paragraphs (1)(a) or (b).
(d) Provide timely updates to an affected person regarding
the status of an incident and any actions taken.
(e) Ensure the policies and procedures are prominently
posted on the state university's or Florida College System
institution's website and available to students, faculty, staff,
and visitors upon request.
(3) Each state university and Florida College System
institution must annually review and update the policies and
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb77-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 77 2026
procedures to incorporate the best practices in threat
assessment, campus security, and safety.
(4) The Board of Governors may adopt regulations and the
State Board of Education may adopt rules to administer this
section.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb77-00